Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2355.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9(f)(2) and (h) of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, are amended and subsection (f) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 9. Procedure.--* * *(f) * * *(2) Such order may also assess a civil penalty against the respondent in a complaint of discrimination filed under sections 5(h) or 5.3:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (i) in an amount not exceeding [ten thousand dollars ($10,000)] twenty-six thousand two hundred sixty-two dollars ($26,262) if the respondent has not been adjudged to have committed any prior discriminatory practice;(ii) in an amount not exceeding [twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)] sixty-five thousand six hundred fifty-three dollars ($65,653) if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed one other discriminatory practice during the five-year period ending on the date of this order; or(iii) in an amount not exceeding [fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)] one hundred thirty-one thousand three hundred eight dollars ($131,308) if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed more than one other discriminatory practice during the seven-year period ending on the date of this order.If, however, the acts constituting the discriminatory practice that is the object of the charge are committed by the same natural person who has been previously adjudged to have committed acts constituting a discriminatory practice, then the civil penalties set forth in subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) may be imposed without regard to the period of time within which any subsequent discriminatory practice occurred.(2.1) Beginning in fiscal year 2026-2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Commission shall determine the percentage change between the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: All Items (CPI-U) for the United States City Average, as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for October preceding the date of adjustment and the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: All Items (CPI-U) for the United States City Average for October of the prior year. If the percentage change is positive, the Commission 20260HB2355PN3124 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall adjust the civil penalties under paragraph (2)(i), (ii) and (iii) accordingly. The adjusted civil penalty amounts shall take effect July 1 of each fiscal year. The Commission shall transmit notice of the adjusted civil penalty amounts to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *(h) Any complaint filed pursuant to this section must be so filed within [one hundred eighty] three hundred sixty-five days after the alleged act of discrimination, unless otherwise required by the Fair Housing Act.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2355PN3124 - 3 - 12345678910111213